District of Columbia statutes.
25-722

Hours of sale and delivery for off-premises retail licensees.

(a)

A licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license, class A or B, may sell and deliver alcoholic beverages only between the hours of 7:00 a.m. and midnight, Monday through Saturday, and during those same hours on December 24 and 31 of each year, subject to voluntary agreements [settlement agreements] pursuant to § 25-446.

(b)

The Board may also permit a licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license, class A or B, to sell or deliver alcoholic beverages between the hours of 7:00 a.m. and midnight on Sundays, subject to voluntary agreements [settlement agreements] pursuant to § 25-446.

(c)

A licensee under a retailer’s license, class B, which meets the requirements of § 25-303(c)(1) through (3), may also sell or deliver alcoholic beverages between the hours of 9:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. on Sundays and between the hours of 10:00 p.m. and midnight, Monday through Sunday, and on December 24 and December 31 of each year.

May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, § 101(z), 51 DCR 6525
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 8122, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 20, 2012, D.C. Law 19-168, § 2052, 59 DCR 8025
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(y), 60 DCR 3410
This section is referenced in § 25-123.
D.C. Law 15-187 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 19-21, in subsecs. (a) and (b), substituted “midnight” for “10 p.m.”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-168 substituted “7:00 a.m.” for “9:00 a.m.” in (a) and (b); added “subject to voluntary agreements pursuant to § 25-446” in (a); and added “subject to the voluntary agreements pursuant to § 25-446” in (b).
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 substituted “class A or B” for “class B” in (b).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Independence Day Class A Retailer Sales Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-451, June 28, 2010, 57 DCR 5667).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 8012 of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).
For temporary amendment of (b), see § 2(y) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(y) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).
Short title: Section 8121 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided that subtitle M of title VIII of the act may be cited as “Off-premise Alcohol Act of 2011”.
Section 8124 of D.C. Law 19-21 provided: “Sec. 8124. This subtitle shall apply as of July 1, 2011.”